Illinois, session 104th, SB2965.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Renewable Fuels Infrastructure Fund.  8    Section 10. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 9adding Title XIX as follows: 10    (415 ILCS 5/Tit. XIX heading new)11TITLE XIX: RENEWABLE FUELS INFRASTRUCTURE PROGRAM 12    (415 ILCS 5/60 new)13    Sec. 60. Creation; administration. The General Assembly 14hereby establishes the Renewable Fuels Infrastructure Program 15(RFI Program). The Department of Agriculture shall administer 16the Renewable Infrastructure Program in accordance with the 17terms of this Title. Grants may be awarded from the Renewable 18Fuels Infrastructure Fund to applicants satisfying the 19application and eligibility requirements established by the 20Department of Agriculture, by rule.   SB2965- 2 -LRB104 19196 BDA 32641 b1    (415 ILCS 5/60.1 new)2    Sec. 60.1. Renewable Fuels Infrastructure Fund.3    (a) The Renewable Fuels Infrastructure Fund is created as 4a special fund in the State treasury. The Fund may accept 5moneys from any lawful source. Any interest earned on moneys 6in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund.7    (b) Moneys in the Fund shall be used by the Department of 8Agriculture (1) to provide grants to petroleum marketers, 9petroleum terminal operators, and any other companies that the 10Department of Agriculture, by rule, determines are eligible 11for grant funding under this Title and (2) to pay for the 12administration costs incurred by the Department of Agriculture 13in the management of the grant program.14    (c) An eligible grant recipient shall not receive more 15than $1,000,000 in grant funding under this Title. 16    (415 ILCS 5/60.2 new)17    Sec. 60.2. Funding. From July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, 18the Comptroller shall order transferred, and the Treasurer 19shall transfer, $3,000,000 each calendar quarter from the 20Underground Storage Tank Fund to the Renewable Fuels 21Infrastructure Fund for the purpose of establishing a grant 22program funding the installation of equipment for the storage 23and dispensing of fuels with higher blends of ethanol or 24biodiesel feedstock. In this Section, "higher blends" means   SB2965- 3 -LRB104 19196 BDA 32641 b1gasoline blends greater than E-10 and biodiesel blends greater 2than B-10. No transfer shall take place from the Underground 3Storage Tank Fund to the Renewable Fuels Infrastructure Fund 4in any calendar quarter from July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, if 5the Underground Storage Tank Fund has a balance at or below 6$50,000,000. 7    (415 ILCS 5/60.3 new)8    Sec. 60.3. Eligibility. Eligible recipients for grant 9funding under this Title are exclusively limited to retail 10petroleum marketers, petroleum terminal operators, and any 11other related companies identified by the Department of 12Agriculture, by rule. No funding shall be made available to 13any public body pursuant to this Title. Applicants for grant 14funding under this Title are responsible for covering at least 1550% of the costs associated with installing the equipment for 16which grant funding is provided under this Title. A company 17may not apply for more than $1,000,000 in grant funding under 18this Title or more than $100,000 for any one site.19    In this Section, "public body" has the meaning given to 20that term in Section 1.02 of the Open Meetings Act. 21    (415 ILCS 5/60.4 new)22    Sec. 60.4. Expenditures. Eligible expenditures from the 23Renewable Fuels Infrastructure Fund include tank 24modifications, tanks, piping, fuel dispensers, and any other   SB2965- 4 -LRB104 19196 BDA 32641 b1equipment deemed necessary by the Department of Agriculture, 2by rule.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.